Utah statutes.
64-9b-3.   Encouragement of private industry -- Types of employers to be sought.

(1)  The department is authorized to encourage private industry to locate and provide rehabilitative and job opportunities for inmates at the Utah state prison and county jails housing inmates under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2)  The department shall determine what type of employer is to be allowed to locate at the prison or county jail, taking into consideration the physical facilities and space at the prison or county jail, the abilities of the inmates, and the type of product to be produced by the employer.

